Louisiana, session 2026, HB763.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:16.16 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§16.16. Duties of the commissioner relative to the settlement agreement database
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Agency" means any state office, department, board, commission,
institution, division, officer or other person, or other organizational unit of
government within the executive branch of state government.
(2) "Settlement agreement" means a final document evidencing a
compromise of a legal action related to an alleged violation of federal or state law
that is entered into by a state agency. The term shall include a consent decree.
B. The commissioner shall ensure the website includes a settlement database.
For each settlement agreement, the database shall include each of the following:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1044 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 763
(1) The date the settlement agreement became final.
(2) A description of the claims settled pursuant to the agreement.
(3) The total amount the settling parties are obligated to pay pursuant to the
agreement and an itemization of each of the following:
(a) The amount of attorney fees and other litigation costs awarded, if any,
including a citation to the legal basis for such award.
(b) The amount, if any, each settling party is obligated to pay that is
expressly specified in the agreement as a civil or criminal penalty or fine.
(c) The amount of each award specified in the agreement that is not
otherwise covered by this Paragraph.
(4) Conditions for termination of the agreement, if applicable.
(5) A brief description of any economic data and methodology used to justify
the terms of the agreement.
(6) Any modifications to the settlement agreement, if applicable.
(7) A copy of the agreement or a statement of confidentiality pursuant to
Subsection C of this Section, as applicable.
C. Each agency shall provide the information required pursuant to the
provisions of this Section for each settlement agreement entered into by that agency
on or after January 1, 2027, within ninety days of the settlement agreement becoming
final. The information shall remain available on the website for five years from the
later of the date of initial entry in the database or the last date the entry was modified
by the agency.
D. Pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, the commissioner may
promulgate rules for implementation and administration of the provisions of this
Section.
E. An agency may apply to the commissioner for a waiver from the
requirements of this Section as long as the agency maintains a publicly accessible
database or website that the commissioner deems to include information regarding
settlement agreements that is substantially similar to the information required
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1044 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 763
pursuant to the provisions of this Section. The commissioner shall ensure that a link
to each of these publicly accessible databases and websites is included on the website
established pursuant to the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. By December 31, 2026, the commissioner of administration shall have
the database required pursuant to Section 1 of this Act established and ready for data input
and public access.
Section 3.(A) The provisions of this Section and Section 2 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration
of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article
III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently
approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and Section 2 of this Act shall
become effective on the day following such approval.
(B) The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective January 1, 2027.